Utah statutes.
76-6a-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) (a)  "Compensation" means money, money bonuses, overrides, prizes, or other real or personal property, tangible or intangible.

(b)  "Compensation" does not include payment based on the sale of goods or services to anyone purchasing the goods or services for actual personal use or consumption.

(2)  "Consideration" does not include payment for sales demonstration equipment and materials furnished at cost for use in making sales and not for resale, or time or effort spent in selling or recruiting activities.

(3)  "Person" includes a business trust, estate, trust, joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(4)  "Pyramid scheme" means any sales device or plan under which a person gives consideration to another person in exchange for compensation or the right to receive compensation which is derived primarily from the introduction of other persons into the sales device or plan rather than from the sale of goods, services, or other property.

